Utah statutes.
53A-29-103.   Interns -- Workers' compensation medical benefits.

(1)  An intern participating in an internship under Section 53A-29-102 is considered to be a volunteer government worker of the sponsoring public school, or an employee of the sponsoring private school, solely for purposes of receiving workers' compensation medical benefits.

(2)  Receipt of medical benefits under Subsection (1) shall be the exclusive remedy against the school and the cooperating employer for all injuries and occupational diseases as provided under Title 34A, Chapters 2, Workers' Compensation Act and 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.

